West Virginia, session 2026, SB693.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 8. LEVIES. §11-8-5a. Classification of forestry property for levy purposes. (a) The purpose of this article is to support West Virginia's forestry industry by classifying forestry equipment as Class I property, recognizing forestry as a component of agriculture essential to the state's economy.(b) For the purposes of property tax classification under §11-8-5 of this code, forestry equipment used in the harvesting, processing, or transportation of forest products shall be classified as Class I property, consistent with the classification of agricultural equipment.(c) Forestry equipment shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Skidders, feller-bunchers, forwarders, cable yarders, forestry processors, dozers, and loaders;(2) Trailers and other machinery primarily used in forestry operations.(d) The definition of agriculture in this section shall expressly include forestry, encompassing the cultivation, harvesting, and processing of forest products.(e) This section shall take effect on July 1, 2026. ARTICLE 15. CONSUMERS SALES AND SERVICE TAX. §11-15-8e. Forestry Equipment. Effective July 1, 2026, the provisions of this article shall not apply to the sales and service of forestry equipment as defined in §11-8-5a of this code.